Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-506.01
Report of accident; effect.

If the Department of Motor Vehicles receives Part II of a report of an accident from the Department of Transportation pursuant to section 60-699, it shall be presumed for purposes of the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act that the Part II information is true, and such presumption shall be accepted, when applicable, as satisfying the requirements of sections 60-507, 60-508, and 60-509.

Laws 1961, c. 319, § 6, p. 1021;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 44;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 71.

In absence of showing that Department of Motor Vehicles mailed Part II of accident report to insurance company named therein, there was no basis for presumption of coverage. Belek v. Travelers Ind. Co., 187 Neb. 470, 191 N.W.2d 819 (1971).